Illinois, session 104th, SB3148.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Flavored Tobacco Ban Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. In this Act: 7    "Alternative nicotine product" means a product or device 8not consisting of or containing tobacco that provides for the 9ingestion into the body of nicotine, whether by chewing, 10smoking, absorbing, dissolving, inhaling, snorting, sniffing, 11or by any other means. "Alternative nicotine product" does not 12include: cigarettes as defined in Section 1 of the Cigarette 13Tax Act and tobacco products as defined in Section 10-5 of the 14Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995; tobacco product and 15electronic cigarette as defined in this Section; or any 16product that is approved by the United States Food and Drug 17Administration for sale as a tobacco cessation product, as a 18tobacco dependence product, or for other medical purposes, and 19that is being marketed and sold solely for that approved 20purpose.21    "Characterizing flavor" means a distinguishable taste or 22aroma, other than the taste or aroma of tobacco, including, 23but not limited to, any fruit, chocolate, vanilla, honey,   SB3148- 2 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1candy, cocoa, dessert, alcoholic beverage, mint, menthol, 2wintergreen, herb, or spice flavoring. In no event shall a 3tobacco product, related tobacco product, alternative nicotine 4product, or solution or substance intended for use with 5electronic cigarettes or any component part of a tobacco 6product, related tobacco product, alternative nicotine 7product, or solution or substance intended for use with 8electronic cigarettes be construed to have a characterizing 9flavor based solely on the use of trace additives or 10flavorings or the provision of ingredient information.11    "Department" means the Department of Human Services.12    "Distinguishable" means perceivable by either the sense of 13smell or taste.14    "Distributor" means a person who sells, offers for sale, 15or transfers any flavored cigarettes, flavored tobacco 16products, or tobacco products for resale and not for use or 17consumption. "Distributor" includes a "distributor" as defined 18in Section 1 of the Cigarette Tax Act, Section 1 of the 19Cigarette Use Tax Act, and Section 10-5 of the Tobacco 20Products Tax Act of 1995.21    "Electronic cigarette" means:22        (1) any device that employs a battery or other 23    mechanism to heat a solution or substance to produce a 24    vapor or aerosol intended for inhalation;25        (2) any cartridge or container of a solution or 26    substance intended to be used with or in the device or to   SB3148- 3 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1    refill the device; or2        (3) any solution or substance, whether or not it 3    contains nicotine, intended for use in the device.4    "Electronic cigarette" includes, but is not limited to, 5any electronic nicotine delivery system, electronic cigar, 6electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, electronic hookah, vape 7pen, or similar product or device, and any components or parts 8that can be used to build the product or device. "Electronic 9cigarette" does not include: cigarettes as defined in Section 101 of the Cigarette Tax Act; tobacco product, related tobacco 11product, and alternative nicotine product as defined in this 12Section; any product approved by the United States Food and 13Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco cessation product, 14as a tobacco dependence product, or for other medical 15purposes, and is being marketed and sold solely for that 16approved purpose; any asthma inhaler prescribed by a physician 17for that condition and is being marketed and sold solely for 18that approved purpose; or any therapeutic product approved for 19use under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program 20Act.21    "Flavored alternative nicotine product" means any 22alternative nicotine product that contains a natural or 23artificial constituent or additive that imparts a 24characterizing flavor.25    "Flavored related tobacco product" means any related 26tobacco product that contains a natural or artificial   SB3148- 4 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1constituent or additive that imparts a characterizing flavor.2    "Flavored solution or substance intended for use with 3electronic cigarettes" means any solution or substance 4intended for use with electronic cigarettes that contains a 5natural or artificial constituent or additive that imparts a 6characterizing flavor.7    "Flavored tobacco product" means any tobacco product that 8contains a natural or artificial constituent or additive that 9imparts a characterizing flavor.10    "Labeling" means written, printed, pictorial, or graphic 11matter upon any tobacco product, related tobacco product, 12alternative nicotine product, or solution or substance 13intended for use with electronic cigarettes or any of its 14packaging.15    "Packaging" means a pack, box, carton, or container of any 16kind or, if no other container, any wrapping, including 17cellophane, in which a tobacco product, related tobacco 18product, alternative nicotine product, or solution or 19substance intended for use with electronic cigarettes is sold 20or offered for sale to a consumer.21    "Related tobacco product" means any product intended for 22or traditionally used with tobacco, including, but not limited 23to, papers, wraps, tubes, or filters. A product of a type that 24has in the past been used in conjunction with tobacco or 25nicotine use will be deemed a "related tobacco product" 26regardless of any labeling or descriptive language on such   SB3148- 5 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1product stating that the product is not intended for use with 2tobacco or for nontobacco use only or other similar language.3    "Retail location" means: (1) a building from which tobacco 4products, related tobacco products, alternative nicotine 5products, or solutions or substances intended for use with 6electronic cigarettes are sold at retail; or (2) a vending 7machine.8    "Retailer" means a person who engages in this State in the 9sale of tobacco products, related tobacco products, 10alternative nicotine products, or solutions or substances 11intended for use with electronic cigarettes directly to the 12public from a retail location, including a person who operates 13vending machines from which tobacco products, related tobacco 14products, alternative nicotine products, or solutions or 15substances intended for use with electronic cigarettes are 16sold in this State. "Retailer" includes a "retailer" as 17defined in Section 1 of the Cigarette Tax Act and Section 10-5 18of the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995.19    "Secondary distributor" has the meanings provided in 20Section 1 of the Cigarette Tax Act and in Section 1 of the 21Cigarette Use Tax Act.22    "Tobacco product" means any product containing or made 23from tobacco that is intended for human consumption, whether 24smoked, heated, chewed, absorbed, dissolved, inhaled, snorted, 25sniffed, or ingested by any other means, including, but not 26limited to, cigarettes, cigars, little cigars, chewing   SB3148- 6 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1tobacco, pipe tobacco, snuff, snus, and any other smokeless 2tobacco product that contains tobacco that is finely cut, 3ground, powdered, or leaf and intended to be placed in the oral 4cavity. "Tobacco product" includes any component, part, or 5accessory of a tobacco product, whether or not sold 6separately. "Tobacco product" does not include: an electronic 7cigarette and alternative nicotine product as defined in this 8Section; or any product that has been approved by the United 9States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco 10cessation product, as a tobacco dependence product, or for 11other medical purposes, and is being marketed and sold solely 12for that approved purpose. 13    Section 10. Prohibition. 14    (a) A distributor, secondary distributor, retailer, or any 15of the retailer's agents or employees may not sell, offer for 16sale, or possess with the intent to sell or offer for sale, a 17flavored tobacco product, flavored related tobacco product, 18flavored alternative nicotine product, or flavored solution or 19substance intended for use with electronic cigarettes.20    (b) A distributor may temporarily possess or store in this 21State flavored tobacco products, related tobacco products, 22flavored alternative nicotine products, or flavored solutions 23or substances intended for use with electronic cigarettes, 24acquired by the distributor outside this State that, after 25being brought into this State and possessed or stored here   SB3148- 7 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1temporarily, are shipped by the distributor outside this 2State.3    (c) There is a rebuttable presumption that a tobacco 4product, related tobacco product, alternative nicotine 5product, or solution or substance intended for use with 6electronic cigarettes is a flavored tobacco product, flavored 7related tobacco product, flavored alternative nicotine 8product, or flavored solution or substance intended for use 9with electronic cigarettes if the tobacco product, related 10tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or solution or 11substance intended for use with electronic cigarettes has or 12produces a characterizing flavor or, if a manufacturer or any 13of a manufacturer's agents or employees, in the course of 14their agency or employment, has made a statement or claim 15directed to consumers or to the public that the tobacco 16product, alternative nicotine product, or solution or 17substance intended for use with electronic cigarettes has or 18produces a characterizing flavor, including, but not limited 19to, text, color, or images on the product's labeling or 20packaging that are used to explicitly or implicitly 21communicate or suggest that the tobacco product, related 22tobacco product, alternative nicotine product, or solution or 23substance intended for use with electronic cigarettes has a 24characterizing flavor. A product with labeling or packaging 25that suggests the presence of a characterizing flavor or uses 26a concept flavor is presumed to be a flavored tobacco product,   SB3148- 8 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1flavored related tobacco product, flavored alternative 2nicotine product, or flavored solution or substance intended 3for use with electronic cigarettes. 4    Section 15. Administrative rules; enforcement. The 5Department shall enforce this Act and may adopt rules or 6guidelines for the implementation and enforcement of this Act. 7    Section 20. Violations. Upon a decision by the Department, 8after notice and hearing, that a distributor, secondary 9distributor, or retailer or the agent or employee of a 10distributor, secondary distributor, or retailer has engaged in 11any conduct that violates this Act, the Department of Revenue 12may suspend that distributor's license under Section 6 of the 13Cigarette Tax Act, Section 6 of the Cigarette Use Tax Act, and 14Section 10-25 of the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995; that 15secondary distributor's license under Section 6 of the 16Cigarette Tax Act and Section 6 of the Cigarette Use Tax Act; 17or that retailer's license under Section 6 of the Cigarette 18Tax Act and Section 10-25 of the Tobacco Products Tax Act of 191995. Any suspension shall be preceded by a notice from the 20Department of Revenue of the initial determination of 21violation made by the Department. A license shall be suspended 223 days for a first violation, 7 days for a second violation, 23and 30 days for a third and each subsequent violation.   SB3148- 9 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1    Section 25. No conflict with federal or State law. Nothing 2in this Act shall be interpreted or applied to create any 3requirement, power, or duty that is preempted by federal or 4State law. 5    Section 30. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 6severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 7    Section 80. The Cigarette Tax Act is amended by changing 8Section 6 as follows: 9    (35 ILCS 130/6)  (from Ch. 120, par. 453.6)10    Sec. 6. Revocation, cancellation, or suspension of 11license. The Department may, after notice and hearing as 12provided for by this Act, revoke, cancel or suspend the 13license of any distributor, secondary distributor, or retailer 14for the violation of any provision of this Act, or for 15noncompliance with any provision herein contained, or for any 16noncompliance with any lawful rule or regulation promulgated 17by the Department under Section 8 of this Act, or because the 18licensee is determined to be ineligible for a distributor's 19license for any one or more of the reasons provided for in 20Section 4 of this Act, or because the licensee is determined to 21be ineligible for a secondary distributor's license for any 22one or more of the reasons provided for in Section 4c of this 23Act, or because the licensee is determined to be ineligible   SB3148- 10 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1for a retailer's license for any one or more of the reasons 2provided for in Section 4g of this Act. However, no such 3license shall be revoked, cancelled or suspended, except after 4a hearing by the Department with notice to the distributor, 5secondary distributor, or retailer, as aforesaid, and 6affording such distributor, secondary distributor, or retailer 7a reasonable opportunity to appear and defend, and any 8distributor, secondary distributor, or retailer aggrieved by 9any decision of the Department with respect thereto may have 10the determination of the Department judicially reviewed, as 11herein provided. 12    The Department may revoke, cancel, or suspend the license 13of any distributor for a violation of the Tobacco Products 14Manufacturers' Escrow Enforcement Act of 2003 as provided in 15Section 30 of that Act. The Department may revoke, cancel, or 16suspend the license of any secondary distributor for a 17violation of subsection (e) of Section 15 of the Tobacco 18Products Manufacturers' Escrow Enforcement Act of 2003. 19    The Department may suspend the license of any distributor 20or retailer for a violation of the Flavored Tobacco Ban Act as 21provided in Section 20 of that Act. 22    If the retailer has a training program that facilitates 23compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the Department shall 24suspend for 3 days the license of that retailer for a fourth or 25subsequent violation of the Prevention of Tobacco Use by 26Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution of   SB3148- 11 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1Tobacco Products Act, as provided in subsection (a) of Section 22 of that Act. For the purposes of this Section, any violation 3of subsection (a) of Section 2 of the Prevention of Tobacco Use 4by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution of 5Tobacco Products Act occurring at the retailer's licensed 6location during a 24-month period shall be counted as a 7violation against the retailer.8    If the retailer does not have a training program that 9facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 10Department shall suspend for 3 days the license of that 11retailer for a second violation of the Prevention of Tobacco 12Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution 13of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in subsection (a-5) of 14Section 2 of that Act.15    If the retailer does not have a training program that 16facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 17Department shall suspend for 7 days the license of that 18retailer for a third violation of the Prevention of Tobacco 19Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution 20of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in subsection (a-5) of 21Section 2 of that Act.22    If the retailer does not have a training program that 23facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 24Department shall suspend for 30 days the license of a retailer 25for a fourth or subsequent violation of the Prevention of 26Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and   SB3148- 12 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1Distribution of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in 2subsection (a-5) of Section 2 of that Act. 3    A training program that facilitates compliance with 4minimum-age tobacco laws must include at least the following 5elements: (i) it must explain that only individuals displaying 6valid identification demonstrating that they are 21 years of 7age or older shall be eligible to purchase cigarettes or 8tobacco products and (ii) it must explain where a clerk can 9check identification for a date of birth. The training may be 10conducted electronically. Each retailer that has a training 11program shall require each employee who completes the training 12program to sign a form attesting that the employee has 13received and completed tobacco training. The form shall be 14kept in the employee's file and may be used to provide proof of 15training. 16    Any distributor, secondary distributor, or retailer 17aggrieved by any decision of the Department under this Section 18may, within 20 days after notice of the decision, protest and 19request a hearing. Upon receiving a request for a hearing, the 20Department shall give notice in writing to the distributor, 21secondary distributor, or retailer requesting the hearing that 22contains a statement of the charges preferred against the 23distributor, secondary distributor, or retailer and that 24states the time and place fixed for the hearing. The 25Department shall hold the hearing in conformity with the 26provisions of this Act and then issue its final administrative   SB3148- 13 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1decision in the matter to the distributor, secondary 2distributor, or retailer. In the absence of a protest and 3request for a hearing within 20 days, the Department's 4decision shall become final without any further determination 5being made or notice given.6    No license so revoked, as aforesaid, shall be reissued to 7any such distributor, secondary distributor, or retailer 8within a period of 6 months after the date of the final 9determination of such revocation. No such license shall be 10reissued at all so long as the person who would receive the 11license is ineligible to receive a distributor's license under 12this Act for any one or more of the reasons provided for in 13Section 4 of this Act, is ineligible to receive a secondary 14distributor's license under this Act for any one or more of the 15reasons provided for in Section 4c of this Act, or is 16determined to be ineligible for a retailer's license under the 17Act for any one or more of the reasons provided for in Section 184g of this Act.19    The Department, upon complaint filed in the circuit court, 20may by injunction restrain any person who fails, or refuses, 21to comply with any of the provisions of this Act from acting as 22a distributor, secondary distributor, or retailer of 23cigarettes in this State.24(Source: P.A. 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.) 25    Section 85. The Cigarette Use Tax Act is amended by   SB3148- 14 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1changing Section 6 as follows: 2    (35 ILCS 135/6)  (from Ch. 120, par. 453.36)3    Sec. 6. Revocation, cancellation, or suspension of 4license. The Department may, after notice and hearing as 5provided for by this Act, revoke, cancel or suspend the 6license of any distributor or secondary distributor for the 7violation of any provision of this Act, or for non-compliance 8with any provision herein contained, or for any non-compliance 9with any lawful rule or regulation promulgated by the 10Department under Section 21 of this Act, or because the 11licensee is determined to be ineligible for a distributor's 12license for any one or more of the reasons provided for in 13Section 4 of this Act, or because the licensee is determined to 14be ineligible for a secondary distributor's license for any 15one or more of the reasons provided for in Section 4b or 16Section 7a of this Act. However, no such license shall be 17revoked, canceled or suspended, except after a hearing by the 18Department with notice to the distributor or secondary 19distributor, as aforesaid, and affording such distributor or 20secondary distributor a reasonable opportunity to appear and 21defend, and any distributor or secondary distributor aggrieved 22by any decision of the Department with respect thereto may 23have the determination of the Department judicially reviewed, 24as herein provided. 25    The Department may revoke, cancel, or suspend the license   SB3148- 15 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1of any distributor for a violation of the Tobacco Products 2Manufacturers' Escrow Enforcement Act of 2003 as provided in 3Section 30 of that Act. The Department may revoke, cancel, or 4suspend the license of any secondary distributor for a 5violation of subsection (e) of Section 15 of the Tobacco 6Products Manufacturers' Escrow Enforcement Act of 2003. 7    The Department may suspend the license of any distributor 8for a violation of the Flavored Tobacco Ban Act as provided in 9Section 20 of that Act. 10    Any distributor or secondary distributor aggrieved by any 11decision of the Department under this Section may, within 20 12days after notice of the decision, protest and request a 13hearing. Upon receiving a request for a hearing, the 14Department shall give notice in writing to the distributor or 15secondary distributor requesting the hearing that contains a 16statement of the charges preferred against the distributor or 17secondary distributor and that states the time and place fixed 18for the hearing. The Department shall hold the hearing in 19conformity with the provisions of this Act and then issue its 20final administrative decision in the matter to the distributor 21or secondary distributor. In the absence of a protest and 22request for a hearing within 20 days, the Department's 23decision shall become final without any further determination 24being made or notice given.25    No license so revoked, shall be reissued to any such 26distributor or secondary distributor within a period of 6   SB3148- 16 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1months after the date of the final determination of such 2revocation. No such license shall be reissued at all so long as 3the person who would receive the license is ineligible to 4receive a distributor's license under this Act for any one or 5more of the reasons provided for in Section 4 of this Act or is 6ineligible to receive a secondary distributor's license under 7this Act for any one or more of the reasons provided for in 8Section 4b and Section 7a of this Act.9    The Department upon complaint filed in the circuit court 10may by injunction restrain any person who fails, or refuses, 11to comply with this Act from acting as a distributor or 12secondary distributor of cigarettes in this State.13(Source: P.A. 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.) 14    Section 90. The Tobacco Products Tax Act of 1995 is 15amended by changing Section 10-25 as follows: 16    (35 ILCS 143/10-25)17    Sec. 10-25. License actions. 18    (a) The Department may, after notice and a hearing, 19revoke, cancel, or suspend the license of any distributor or 20retailer who violates any of the provisions of this Act, fails 21to keep books and records as required under this Act, fails to 22make books and records available for inspection upon demand by 23a duly authorized employee of the Department, or violates a 24rule or regulation of the Department for the administration   SB3148- 17 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1and enforcement of this Act. The notice shall specify the 2alleged violation or violations upon which the revocation, 3cancellation, or suspension proceeding is based.4    (b) The Department may revoke, cancel, or suspend the 5license of any distributor for a violation of the Tobacco 6Products Manufacturers' Escrow Enforcement Act of 2003 as 7provided in Section 30 of that Act.8    (b-5) The Department may suspend the license of any 9distributor or retailer for a violation of the Flavored 10Tobacco Ban Act as provided in Section 20 of that Act.11    (c) If the retailer has a training program that 12facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 13Department shall suspend for 3 days the license of that 14retailer for a fourth or subsequent violation of the 15Prevention of Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and 16Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in 17subsection (a) of Section 2 of that Act. For the purposes of 18this Section, any violation of subsection (a) of Section 2 of 19the Prevention of Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age 20and Sale and Distribution of Tobacco Products Act occurring at 21the retailer's licensed location, during a 24-month period, 22shall be counted as a violation against the retailer.23    If the retailer does not have a training program that 24facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 25Department shall suspend for 3 days the license of that 26retailer for a second violation of the Prevention of Tobacco   SB3148- 18 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution 2of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in subsection (a-5) of 3Section 2 of that Act.4    If the retailer does not have a training program that 5facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 6Department shall suspend for 7 days the license of that 7retailer for a third violation of the Prevention of Tobacco 8Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and Distribution 9of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in subsection (a-5) of 10Section 2 of that Act.11    If the retailer does not have a training program that 12facilitates compliance with minimum-age tobacco laws, the 13Department shall suspend for 30 days the license of a retailer 14for a fourth or subsequent violation of the Prevention of 15Tobacco Use by Persons under 21 Years of Age and Sale and 16Distribution of Tobacco Products Act, as provided in 17subsection (a-5) of Section 2 of that Act. 18    A training program that facilitates compliance with 19minimum-age tobacco laws must include at least the following 20elements: (i) it must explain that only individuals displaying 21valid identification demonstrating that they are 21 years of 22age or older shall be eligible to purchase cigarettes or 23tobacco products and (ii) it must explain where a clerk can 24check identification for a date of birth. The training may be 25conducted electronically. Each retailer that has a training 26program shall require each employee who completes the training   SB3148- 19 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1program to sign a form attesting that the employee has 2received and completed tobacco training. The form shall be 3kept in the employee's file and may be used to provide proof of 4training.5    (d) The Department may, by application to any circuit 6court, obtain an injunction restraining any person who engages 7in business as a distributor of tobacco products without a 8license (either because his or her license has been revoked, 9canceled, or suspended or because of a failure to obtain a 10license in the first instance) from engaging in that business 11until that person, as if that person were a new applicant for a 12license, complies with all of the conditions, restrictions, 13and requirements of Section 10-20 of this Act and qualifies 14for and obtains a license. Refusal or neglect to obey the order 15of the court may result in punishment for contempt.16(Source: P.A. 104-6, eff. 6-16-25.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect June 1, 182026.  SB3148- 20 -LRB104 20194 RLC 33645 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    New Act4    35 ILCS 130/6from Ch. 120, par. 453.65    35 ILCS 135/6from Ch. 120, par. 453.366    35 ILCS 143/10-25